Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.52.070

Criminal trespass in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of criminal trespass in the first degree if he or she knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in a building.

(2) Criminal trespass in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 372; 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 12; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.52.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 244: See RCW 9A.44.902.